Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-255
Bingo games; random selection; authorized designators or devices.

(1)(a) Only the following means of random selection of the numbered designators shall be used in the conduct of any bingo game:

(i) An electrically operated blower machine containing balls which the operator may take from the air one at a time while the blower is in operation, or which provides a trap or other mechanical means for automatically catching not more than one ball at a time while the blower is in operation; or

(ii) A mechanically or manually operated cage which provides a trap or other mechanical means for automatically catching not more than one ball at a time while the cage is in operation.

(b) For any means of selection permitted by subdivisions (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, the balls to be drawn shall be essentially the same in size, shape, weight, balance, and all other characteristics so that at all times during the conduct of bingo each ball possesses the capacity for equal agitation with any other ball within the receptacle. All balls within the total set shall be subject to random selection at the beginning of each bingo game.

(2) For purposes of bingo utilizing song titles, musical artists, or music genres, only a mechanical, manually operated, or electronic device that ensures song titles, musical artists, or music genres are randomly selected shall be used in the conduct of such a bingo game.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 39;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 9-162;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 56;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 48;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 19.
July 1, 2026